Nebraska, session 109, LB508.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB508 LB508
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 55-117, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
55-117 (1) The Nebraska National Guard shall be liable at all times
to be ordered into active service, and shall be first called out by the
Governor on all occasions for military service within the state, in time
of war, invasions, riot, rebellion, insurrection, disaster, or reasonable
apprehension thereof, or upon the requisition of the President of the
United States. In case the National Guard is insufficient in number or is
not available, the Governor may by proclamation order the enrollment for
active service of such additional portion of the militia as he may deem
necessary to meet the emergency or to comply with the requisition of the
President of the United States, designating the same by draft, if a
sufficient number shall not volunteer, and may organize the same in the
manner herein provided for organizing the Nebraska National Guard. When
so ordered out for service, the militia shall be subject to the same
regulations and render the same service as required of the Nebraska
National Guard, and receive the same compensation as that prescribed at
the time of said service for the army of the United States. In any
situation where the National Guard is ordered to duty for any of the
purposes listed in this section it shall be the duty, the responsibility,
and the obligation of the Governor through the Adjutant General to
exercise such control as he deems essential for the purpose of quelling
any riot, rebellion or insurrection, and for such purposes any local
police authorities shall be subject to his control and direction.
(2) The Nebraska National Guard shall not be ordered into active
combat in military service of the United States, unless the United States
Congress has declared war or called forth the Nebraska National Guard to
execute the laws of the union, suppress insurrection, or repel invasions
pursuant to the United States Constitution.
(3) The Governor shall review every current federal order that has
placed members of the Nebraska National Guard into active combat to
-2-

LB508 LB508
2025 2025
determine whether the order complies with subsection (2) of this section.
If the Governor determines that any order does not comply with subsection
(2) of this section, then the Governor shall take any action necessary to
immediately return such members of the Nebraska National Guard to
Nebraska.
(4) The Governor shall submit a report to the Government, Military
and Veterans Affairs Committee of the Legislature that summarizes the
Governor's review of the federal orders and any action that the Governor
took in response to that review, within thirty days after the review is
completed.
(5) For the purposes of this section, active combat means:
(a) Participation in an armed conflict;
(b) Performance of a hazardous service relating to an armed conflict
in a foreign state; or
(c) Performance of a duty through an instrumentality of war.
Sec. 2. Original section 55-118, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-3-